en: refined salt
bg: рафинирана сол
ca: sal refinada
da: raffineret salt
de: raffiniertes Salz
es: sal refinada
fr: sel raffiné
hr: rafinirana sol
it: sale raffinato
nl: geraffineerd zout
pl: sól rafinowana
pt: sal refinado
sv: raffinerat salt

en: unrefined salt
bg: нерафинирана сол
ca: sal no refinada
da: uraffineret salt
de: unraffiniertes Salz
es: sal no refinada
fi: karkea suola
fr: sel non raffiné
hr: nerafinirana sol
it: sale non raffinato
sv: oraffinerat salt

en: Kosher salt
ar: ملح كوشير
ca: sal kosher
de: Koscheres Salz
eo: Koŝera salo
es: Sal kosher
fi: koshersuola
fr: Sel casher
hr: košer soli
hu: Kóser só
id: Garam kosher
it: Sale Kosher
ms: Garam kosher
pt: Sal grosso
sv: koshersalt

en: sea salt, seasalt, bay salt, solar salt, natural sea salt, pure sea salt, mineral sea salt
af: seesout
ar: ملح البحر
az: dəniz duzu
bg: морска сол
ca: sal marina, sal maria de taula
cs: mořská sůl
da: havsalt
de: Meersalz
el: θαλασσινό αλάτι
eo: maro salo
es: sal marina, sal marina de mesa, sal del mar
eu: itsas gatza
fa: نمک دریایی
fi: merisuola
fr: sel marin, sel de mer, sels minéraux de mer, sel marin de table
gl: sal mariño
he: מלח ים
hr: morska sol
hu: tengeri só
id: garam laut
is: sjávarsalt
it: sale marino
ja: 海塩
ko: 천일염
lv: jūras sāls
ms: garam laut
nb: havsalt
nl: zeezout
pl: sól morska, soli morskiej
pt: sal marinho
ro: sare de mare
ru: морская соль, соль морская
sd: سامونڊي لوڻ
sk: morská soľ
sl: morska sol
sv: havssalt
th: เกลือสมุทร
tr: deniz tuzu
uk: морська сіль, сіль морська
ur: سمندری نمک
zh: 海盐

en: grey sea salt
fr: sel de mer gris

en: Celtic sea salt
bg: Келтска морска сол
ca: sal marina celta
de: Keltisches Meersalz
es: sal marina celta
fr: sel de la Mer Celtique
hr: keltska morska sol
it: sale marino celtico

en: coarse sea salt
fr: sel gros de mer

en: unrefined sea salt
bg: нерафинирана морска сол
ca: sal de mar no refinada, sal de mar sense refinar, sal marina sense refinar, sal de taula sense refinar
da: uraffineret havsalt
de: unraffiniertes Meersalz
es: sal de mar no refinada, sal de mar sin refinar, sal marina sin refinar, sal de mesa sin refinar
fi: raffinoimaton merisuola, puhdistamaton merisuola
fr: sel marin non raffiné, sel marin non traité, sel marin gris de cuisine, sel de mer non raffiné
hr: nerafinirana morska sol
hu: finomítatlan tengeri só
it: sale marino integrale
nl: ongeraffineerd zeezout
sl: nerafinirana morska sol
sv: oraffinerat havssalt

en: low sodium unrefined sea salt
da: uraffineret havsalt med lavt natriumindhold
sv: oraffinerat havssalt med låg natriumhalt

en: unrefined sea salt from the Atlantic
ca: sal marina sense refinar de l'Atlàntic, sal de mar sense refinar de l'Atlàntic, sa de taula sense refinar de l'Atlàntic
de: unraffiniertes Atlantiksalz
es: sal marina sin refinar del Atlántico, sal de mar sin refinar del Atlántico, sal de mesa sin refinar del Atlántico
fi: atlantin raffinoimaton merisuola, atlantin puhdistamaton merisuola
fr: Sel marin non raffiné de l'atlantique
hr: nerafinirana morska sol iz Atlantika
it: sale marino integrale dell'Atlantico
nl: Ongeraffineerd zeezout uit de Atlantische Oceaan

en: salt from Noirmoutier, sea salt from Noirmoutier
de: Salz von Noirmoutier, Meeressalz von Noirmoutier
fr: sel de Noirmoutier, sel marin de Noirmoutier
hr: sol iz noirmoutiera
it: sale di Noirmoutier

en: Mediterranean salt, Mediterranean sea salt
bg: средиземноморска сол
ca: sal de la mar Mediterrània, sal mediterrània
da: middelhavssalt
de: Mediterranes Meersalz
es: Sal de la mar mediterránea, sal mediterránea, sal marina del mar mediterráneo
fr: Sel de la Méditerranée, Sel de la Mer Méditerranée
hr: mediteranska sol
it: sale del Mediterraneo
sv: medelhavssalt

en: Salt from Guérande
ca: Sal de Guérande
de: Salz aus Guérande
es: Sal de Guérande
fr: Sel de Guérande, sel marin de guérande, sel de Guérande IGP
hr: sol iz guérande
it: Sale di Guérande
nl: Zout uit Guérande
sv: Guérande-havssalt

en: Salt from Ile de Ré
ca: sal de la illa de Ré, sal marina de la illa de Ré, sal de taula de la illa de Ré
de: Salz von der Insel Ré
es: sal de la isla de Ré, sal marina de la isla de Ré, sal de mesa de la isla de Ré
fr: Sel de l'Ile de Ré, sel marin de l'Ile de Ré
hr: sol iz ile de ré
it: sale dell'Ile de Ré

en: fine salt from Guérande
ca: sal fina de Guérange
es: sal fina de Guérange
fr: sel fin de Guérange, sel de Guérange fin
hr: fina sol iz guérande
it: sale fino di Guérande

en: Salt from Camargue
de: Salz aus der Camargue
fr: Sel de camargue
hr: sol iz camargue
it: sale della Camargue
nl: Zout uit de Camargue

en: grey salt, sel gris
bg: сива сол
ca: sal grisa sal de mar grisa, sal marina grisa
de: graues Salz
es: sal gris, sal de mar gris, sal marina gris
fr: sel gris, sel marin gris, sel gris marin
hr: siva sol
it: Sale grigio

en: grey salt from Guérande
ca: sal grisa de Guérande
de: Meersalz aus der Guérande, Guérande Salz, Guérande Meersalz
es: sal gris de Guérande
fr: sel gris de Guérande
hr: siva sol iz guérande
it: sale grigio di Guérande

en: Fleur de sel
ca: Flor de sal
de: Fleur de Sel, Fleur de Sel-Meersalz
eo: Salfloro
es: Flor de sal
fi: Suolankukka
fr: fleur de sel
hr: fleur de sel
hu: sóvirág
it: Fleur de sel
ja: フルール・ド・セル
nl: Fleur de sel
pt: Flor de sal

en: fleur de sel from Guérande
ca: flor de sal de Guérande
de: Fleur de Sel aus Guérande, Meersalz aus Guérande
es: flor de sal de Guérande
fr: fleur de sel de Guérande
hr: fleur de sel od guérande
it: fior di sale di Guérande
nl: fleur de sel uit Guérande